Nebraska, session 109, LB713.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB713 LB713
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 79-902, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-902 For purposes of the School Employees Retirement Act, unless
the context otherwise requires:
(1) Accumulated contributions means the sum of all amounts deducted
from the compensation of a member and credited to his or her individual
account in the School Retirement Fund together with regular interest
thereon, compounded monthly, quarterly, semiannually, or annually;
(2)(a) Actuarial equivalent means the equality in value of the
aggregate amounts expected to be received under different forms of
payment.
(b) For a school employee hired before July 1, 2017, the
determinations shall be based on the 1994 Group Annuity Mortality Table
reflecting sex-distinct factors blended using twenty-five percent of the
male table and seventy-five percent of the female table. An interest rate
of eight percent per annum shall be reflected in making these
determinations except when a lump-sum settlement is made to an estate.
(c) For a school employee hired on or after July 1, 2017, or rehired
on or after July 1, 2017, after termination of employment and being paid
a retirement benefit or taking a refund of contributions, the
determinations shall be based on a unisex mortality table and an interest
rate specified by the board. Both the mortality table and the interest
rate shall be recommended by the actuary and approved by the retirement
board following an actuarial experience study, a benefit adequacy study,
or a plan valuation. The mortality table, interest rate, and actuarial
factors in effect on the school employee's retirement date will be used
to calculate actuarial equivalency of any retirement benefit. Such
interest rate may be, but is not required to be, equal to the assumed
rate.
(d) If the lump-sum settlement is made to an estate, the interest
rate will be determined by the AAA-rated segment of the Bloomberg
-2-

LB713 LB713
2025 2025
Barclays Long U.S. Corporate Bond Index as of the prior June 30, rounded
to the next lower quarter percent. If the AAA-rated segment of the
Bloomberg Barclays Long U.S. Corporate Bond Index is discontinued or
replaced, a substitute index shall be selected by the board which shall
be a reasonably representative index;
(3) Beneficiary means any person in receipt of a school retirement
allowance or other benefit provided by the act;
(4)(a) Compensation means gross wages or salaries payable to the
member for personal services performed during the plan year and includes
(i) overtime pay, (ii) member retirement contributions, (iii) retroactive
salary payments paid pursuant to court order, arbitration, or litigation
and grievance settlements, and (iv) amounts contributed by the member to
plans under sections 125, 403(b), and 457 of the Internal Revenue Code as
defined in section 49-801.01 or any other section of the code which
defers or excludes such amounts from income.
(b) Compensation does not include (i) fraudulently obtained amounts
as determined by the retirement board, (ii) amounts for accrued unused
sick leave or accrued unused vacation leave converted to cash payments,
(iii) insurance premiums converted into cash payments, (iv) reimbursement
for expenses incurred, (v) fringe benefits, (vi) per diems paid as
expenses, (vii) bonuses for services not actually rendered, (viii) early
retirement inducements, (ix) cash awards, (x) severance pay, or (xi)
employer contributions made for the purposes of separation payments made
at retirement.
(c) Compensation in excess of the limitations set forth in section
401(a)(17) of the Internal Revenue Code as defined in section 49-801.01
shall be disregarded. For an employee who was a member of the retirement
system before the first plan year beginning after December 31, 1995, the
limitation on compensation shall not be less than the amount which was
allowed to be taken into account under the retirement system as in effect
on July 1, 1993;
-3-

LB713 LB713
2025 2025
(5) County school official means (a) until July 1, 2000, the county
superintendent or district superintendent and any person serving in his
or her office who is required by law to have a teacher's certificate and
(b) on or after July 1, 2000, the county superintendent, county school
administrator, or district superintendent and any person serving in his
or her office who is required by law to have a teacher's certificate;
(6)(a) Creditable service means prior service for which credit is
granted under sections 79-926 to 79-929, service credit purchased under
sections 79-933.03 to 79-933.06 and 79-933.08, and all service rendered
while a contributing member of the retirement system; and
(b) Creditable service includes working days, sick days, vacation
days, holidays, and any other leave days for which the employee is paid
regular wages as part of the employee's agreement with the employer.
Creditable service does not include lump-sum payments to the employee
upon termination or retirement in lieu of accrued benefits for such days,
eligibility and vesting credit, service years for which member
contributions are withdrawn and not repaid by the member, service
rendered for which the retirement board determines that the member was
paid less in compensation than the minimum wage as provided in the Wage
and Hour Act, service which the board determines was rendered with the
intent to defraud the retirement system, or service provided to an
employer in a retirement system established pursuant to the Class V
School Employees Retirement Act;
(7) Current benefit means the initial benefit increased by all
adjustments made pursuant to the School Employees Retirement Act;
(8) Disability means an inability to engage in any substantially
gainful activity by reason of any medically determinable physical or
mental impairment which was initially diagnosed or became disabling while
the member was an active participant in the plan and which can be
expected to result in death or be of a long-continued and indefinite
duration;
-4-

LB713 LB713
2025 2025
(9) Disability retirement allowance means the annuity paid to a
person upon retirement for disability under section 79-952;
(10) Disability retirement date means the first day of the month
following the date upon which a member's request for disability
retirement is received on a retirement application provided by the
retirement system if the member has terminated employment in the school
system and has complied with sections 79-951 to 79-954 as such sections
refer to disability retirement;
(11) Early retirement inducement means, but is not limited to:
(a) A benefit, bonus, or payment to a member in exchange for an
agreement by the member to terminate from employment;
(b) A benefit, bonus, or payment paid to a member in addition to the
member's retirement benefit;
(c) Lump-sum or installment cash payments, except payments for
accrued unused leave converted to cash payments;
(d) An additional salary or wage component of any kind that is being
paid as an incentive to leave employment and not for personal services
performed for which creditable service is granted;
(e) Partial or full employer payment of a member's health, dental,
life, or long-term disability insurance benefits or cash in lieu of such
insurance benefits that extend beyond the member's termination of
employment and contract of employment dates. This subdivision does not
apply to any period during which the member is contributing to the
retirement system and being awarded creditable service; and
(f) Any other form of separation payments made by an employer to a
member at termination, including, but not limited to, purchasing
retirement annuity contracts for the member pursuant to section 79-514,
depositing money for the member in an account established under section
403(b) of the Internal Revenue Code except for payments for accrued
unused leave, or purchasing service credit for the member pursuant to
section 79-933.08;
-5-

LB713 LB713
2025 2025
(12) Eligibility and vesting credit means credit for years, or a
fraction of a year, of participation in a Nebraska government plan for
purposes of determining eligibility for benefits under the School
Employees Retirement Act. Such credit shall not be included as years of
creditable service in the benefit calculation;
(13) Emeritus member means a person (a) who has entered retirement
under the act, including those persons who have retired since July 1,
1945, under any other regularly established retirement or pension system
as contemplated by section 79-916, (b) who has thereafter been reemployed
in any capacity by a public school, a Class V school district, or a
school under the control and management of the Board of Trustees of the
Nebraska State Colleges, the Board of Regents of the University of
Nebraska, or a community college board of governors or has become a state
school official or county school official subsequent to such retirement,
and (c) who has applied to the board for emeritus membership in the
retirement system. The school district or agency shall certify to the
retirement board on forms prescribed by the retirement board that the
annuitant was reemployed, rendered a service, and was paid by the
district or agency for such services;
(14) Employer means the State of Nebraska or any subdivision thereof
or agency of the state or subdivision authorized by law to hire school
employees or to pay their compensation;
(15)(a) Final average compensation means:
(i) Except as provided in subdivision (ii) of this subdivision:
(A) The sum of the member's total compensation during the three
twelve-month periods of service as a school employee in which such
compensation was the greatest divided by thirty-six; or
(B) If a member has such compensation for less than thirty-six
months, the sum of the member's total compensation in all months divided
by the total number of months of his or her creditable service therefor;
and
-6-

LB713 LB713
2025 2025
(ii) For an employee who became a member on or after July 1, 2013:
(A) The sum of the member's total compensation during the five
twelve-month periods of service as a school employee in which such
compensation was the greatest divided by sixty; or
(B) If a member has such compensation for less than sixty months,
the sum of the member's total compensation in all months divided by the
total number of months of his or her creditable service therefor.
(b) Payments under the Retirement Incentive Plan pursuant to section
79-855 and Staff Development Assistance pursuant to section 79-856 shall
not be included in the determination of final average compensation;
(16) Fiscal year means any year beginning July 1 and ending June 30
next following;
(17) Hire date or date of hire means the first day of compensated
service subject to retirement contributions;
(18) Initial benefit means the retirement benefit calculated at the
time of retirement;
(19) Member means any person who has an account in the School
Retirement Fund;
(20) Participation means qualifying for and making required deposits
to the retirement system during the course of a plan year;
(21) Plan year means the twelve-month period beginning on July 1 and
ending on June 30 of the following year;
(22) Prior service means service rendered as a school employee in
the public schools of the State of Nebraska prior to July 1, 1945;
(22) (23) Public school means any and all schools offering
instruction in elementary or high school grades, as defined in section
79-101, which schools are supported by public funds and are wholly under
the control and management of the State of Nebraska or any subdivision
thereof, including (a) schools or other entities established, maintained,
and controlled by the school boards of local school districts, except
Class V school districts, (b) any educational service unit, and (c) any
-7-

LB713 LB713
2025 2025
other educational institution wholly supported by public funds, except
schools under the control and management of the Board of Trustees of the
Nebraska State Colleges, the Board of Regents of the University of
Nebraska, or the community college boards of governors for any community
college areas;
(23) (24) Regular employee means an employee hired by a public
school or under contract in a regular full-time or part-time position who
works a full-time or part-time schedule on an ongoing basis for twenty or
more hours per week. An employee hired as described in this subdivision
to provide service for less than twenty hours per week but who provides
service for an average of twenty hours or more per week in each calendar
month of any three calendar months of a plan year shall, beginning with
the next full payroll period, commence contributions and shall be deemed
a regular employee for all future employment with the same employer;
(24) (25) Regular interest means interest fixed at a rate equal to
the daily treasury yield curve for one-year treasury securities, as
published by the Secretary of the Treasury of the United States, that
applies on July 1 of each year, which may be credited monthly, quarterly,
semiannually, or annually as the board may direct;
(25) (26) Relinquished creditable service means, with respect to a
member who has withdrawn his or her accumulated contributions under
section 79-955, the total amount of creditable service which such member
has given up as a result of his or her election not to remain a member of
the retirement system;
(26) (27) Required beginning date means, for purposes of the
deferral of distributions and the commencement of mandatory distributions
pursuant to section 401(a)(9) of the Internal Revenue Code and the
regulations issued thereunder, April 1 of the year following the calendar
year in which a member:
(a)(i) Terminated employment with all employers participating in the
plan; and
-8-

LB713 LB713
2025 2025
(ii)(A) Attained at least seventy and one-half years of age for a
member who attained seventy and one-half years of age on or before
December 31, 2019;
(B) Attained at least seventy-two years of age for a member who
attained seventy and one-half years of age on or after January 1, 2020,
and prior to January 1, 2023;
(C) Attained at least seventy-three years of age for a member who
attained seventy-two years of age after December 31, 2022, and seventy-
three years of age prior to January 1, 2033; or
(D) Attained at least seventy-five years of age for a member who
attained seventy-four years of age after December 31, 2032; or
(b)(i) Terminated employment with all employers participating in the
plan; and
(ii) Otherwise reached the date specified by section 401(a)(9) of
the Internal Revenue Code and the regulations issued thereunder;
(27) (28) Required deposit means the deduction from a member's
compensation as provided for in section 79-958 which shall be deposited
in the School Retirement Fund;
(28) (29) Retirement means qualifying for and accepting a school or
disability retirement allowance granted under the School Employees
Retirement Act;
(29) (30) Retirement application means the form approved and
provided by the retirement system for acceptance of a member's request
for either regular or disability retirement;
(30) (31) Retirement board or board means the Public Employees
Retirement Board;
(31) (32) Retirement date means (a) if the member has terminated
employment, the first day of the month following the date upon which a
member's request for retirement is received on a retirement application
provided by the retirement system or (b) if the member has filed a
retirement application but has not yet terminated employment, the first
-9-

LB713 LB713
2025 2025
day of the month following the date on which the member terminates
employment. An application may be filed no more than one hundred twenty
days prior to the effective date of the member's initial benefit;
(32) (33) Retirement system means the School Employees Retirement
System of the State of Nebraska;
(33) (34) Savings annuity means payments for life, made in equal
monthly payments, derived from the accumulated contributions of a member;
(34) (35) School employee means a contributing member who earns
service credit pursuant to section 79-927. For purposes of this section,
contributing member means the following persons who receive compensation
from a public school: (a) Regular employees; (b) regular employees having
retired pursuant to the School Employees Retirement Act who subsequently
provide compensated service on a regular basis in any capacity; and (c)
regular employees hired by a public school on an ongoing basis to assume
the duties of other regular employees who are temporarily absent.
Substitute employees, temporary employees, and employees who have not
attained the age of eighteen years shall not be considered school
employees;
(35) (36) School retirement allowance means the total of the savings
annuity and the service annuity or formula annuity paid a person who has
retired under sections 79-931 to 79-935. The monthly payments shall be
payable at the end of each calendar month during the life of a retired
member. The first payment shall include all amounts accrued since the
effective date of the award of annuity. The last payment shall be at the
end of the calendar month in which such member dies or in accordance with
the payment option chosen by the member;
(36) (37) School year means one fiscal year which includes not less
than one thousand instructional hours or, in the case of service in the
State of Nebraska prior to July 1, 1945, not less than seventy-five
percent of the then legal school year;
(37) (38) Service means employment as a school employee and shall
-10-

LB713 LB713
2025 2025
not be deemed interrupted by (a) termination at the end of the school
year of the contract of employment of an employee in a public school if
the employee enters into a contract of employment in any public school,
except a school in a Class V school district, for the following school
year, (b) temporary or seasonal suspension of service that does not
terminate the employee's employment, (c) leave of absence authorized by
the employer for a period not exceeding twelve months, (d) leave of
absence because of disability, or (e) military service when properly
authorized by the retirement board. Service does not include any period
of disability for which disability retirement benefits are received under
sections 79-951 to 79-953;
(38) (39) Service annuity means payments for life, made in equal
monthly installments, derived from appropriations made by the State of
Nebraska to the retirement system;
(39) (40) State deposit means the deposit by the state in the
retirement system on behalf of any member;
(40) (41) State school official means the Commissioner of Education
and his or her professional staff who are required by law or by the State
Department of Education to hold a certificate as such term is defined in
section 79-807;
(41) (42) Substitute employee means a person hired by a public
school as a temporary employee to assume the duties of regular employees
due to a temporary absence of any regular employees. Substitute employee
does not mean a person hired as a regular employee on an ongoing basis to
assume the duties of other regular employees who are temporarily absent;
(42) (43) Surviving spouse means (a) the spouse married to the
member on the date of the member's death or (b) the spouse or former
spouse of the member if survivorship rights are provided under a
qualified domestic relations order filed with the board pursuant to the
Spousal Pension Rights Act. The spouse or former spouse shall supersede
the spouse married to the member on the date of the member's death as
-11-

LB713 LB713
2025 2025
provided under a qualified domestic relations order. If the benefits
payable to the spouse or former spouse under a qualified domestic
relations order are less than the value of benefits entitled to the
surviving spouse, the spouse married to the member on the date of the
member's death shall be the surviving spouse for the balance of the
benefits;
(43) (44) Temporary employee means an employee hired by a public
school who is not a regular employee and who is hired to provide service
for a limited period of time to accomplish a specific purpose or task.
When such specific purpose or task is complete, the employment of such
temporary employee shall terminate and in no case shall the temporary
employment period exceed one year in duration;
(44)(a) (45)(a) Termination of employment or termination occurs on
the date the member experiences a bona fide separation from service with
the member's employer. The date of the separation is the end of the
member's contractual agreement or, if there is no contract or only
partial fulfillment of a contract, as determined by the employer.
(b) A member shall not be deemed to have incurred a termination of
employment if the board determines based on the facts and circumstances
that:
(i) A claimed termination was not a bona fide separation from
service with the member's employer;
(ii) A member was compensated for a full contractual period when the
member stopped working prior to the end date of the contract; or
(iii) A member prearranged a return to work that violates the
provisions of the School Employees Retirement Act.
(c) A member who experiences a separation from service must comply
with the return-to-work provisions of section 79-930 if the member is
subsequently employed by an employer participating in the retirement
system.
(d) Nothing in this subdivision precludes an employer from adopting
-12-

LB713 LB713
2025 2025
a policy which limits or denies employees who have experienced a
separation from service with the employer from working as a volunteer or
substitute employee within one hundred eighty days after the employee
experiences such separation from service; and
(45) (46) Voluntary service or volunteer means providing bona fide
unpaid service to any employer.
Sec. 2. Section 79-930, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-930 (1)(a) A member who experiences a separation from service
with the member's employer but has not submitted a retirement application
or a request for distribution pursuant to section 79-955, or received a
retirement benefit, disability retirement benefit, or distribution
pursuant to section 79-955, from the retirement system, may return to
work as a temporary employee, substitute employee, or volunteer for any
employer participating in the retirement system. Such an employee:
(i) Shall be deemed to have incurred a termination for purposes of
sections 79-921, 79-932, 79-933.02 to 79-933.06, and 79-933.08;
(ii) Shall not be deemed to have incurred a termination for purposes
of sections 79-933, 79-951, and 79-955, and shall not be eligible to
receive a retirement benefit, disability retirement benefit, or
distribution pursuant to section 79-955, from the retirement system,
until the member incurs a termination of employment as defined in
described in subdivision (45) of section 79-902; and
(iii) Except as provided in subdivision (1)(b) of this section,
shall not be eligible to contribute to the retirement system pursuant to
section 79-958 or accrue service credit in the retirement system pursuant
to section 79-927.
(b)(i) A member as described in subdivision (1)(a) of this section
who becomes a regular employee for an employer participating in the
retirement system shall immediately begin making contributions pursuant
to section 79-958 on all compensation paid by such employer and accrue
-13-

LB713 LB713
2025 2025
service credit pursuant to section 79-927 for all such service performed
for such employer, including any work as a temporary employee or
substitute employee.
(ii) A member as described in subdivision (1)(a) of this section who
has not established eligibility as a regular employee at another employer
shall not make contributions pursuant to section 79-958 on all
compensation paid by such employer nor accrue service credit pursuant to
section 79-927 for work performed by the member as a temporary employee
or substitute employee for such employer.
(c) Work performed while the member is not contributing to the
retirement system pursuant to subdivision (1)(a) of this section shall
not accrue service credit in the retirement system pursuant to section
79-927 and cannot be purchased as service credit under sections 79-933.03
to 79-933.06 and 79-933.08.
(2)(a) A member who experiences a separation from service with the
member's employer and has submitted a retirement application or a request
for distribution pursuant to section 79-955, or received a retirement
benefit, disability retirement benefit, or distribution pursuant to
section 79-955, from the retirement system, shall not be deemed to have
incurred a termination of employment if the member subsequently returns
to work for any employer participating in the retirement system within
one hundred eighty days after separating from service, unless such work
is limited to:
(i) Intermittent work as a volunteer or substitute employee. For
purposes of this subsection:
(A) Intermittent work means work provided on a day-to-day basis that
is not greater than eight days of work during a calendar month; and
(B) Day of work means any length of work as a volunteer or
substitute employee provided during a single calendar day; or
(ii) Work as authorized by, and performed in accordance with,
section 79-920.
-14-

LB713 LB713
2025 2025
(b) The one-hundred-eighty-day period begins on the later of:
(i) The date the member experienced a bona fide separation from
service of all employment with all employers participating in the
retirement system; or
(ii) The date the Nebraska Public Employees Retirement Systems
receives the member's retirement application or request for distribution
pursuant to section 79-955.
(c)(i) A member may seek a determination from the director of the
Nebraska Public Employees Retirement Systems that it has been at least
one hundred eighty days since the member satisfied the requirements
described in this subsection. The director shall make such determination
if the member produces clear and convincing evidence that is received by
the director within forty-five days after the later of:
(A) The date the member experienced a bona fide separation of
service of all employment with all employers participating in the
retirement system; or
(B) The date the member's retirement application or request for
distribution pursuant to section 79-955 is received by the Nebraska
Public Employees Retirement Systems.
(ii) A member may appeal the director's determination to the board
within thirty days after receiving such determination.
(iii) The board's determination on the appeal shall be final and
shall not be appealable to any court.
Sec. 3. Original sections 79-902 and 79-930, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
-15-